Washington statutes.
RCW 31.45.088

Small loans—Disclosure requirements—Advertising—Making loan.

(1) When advertising the availability of small loans, if a licensee includes in an advertisement the fee or interest rate charged by the licensee for a small loan, then the licensee shall also disclose the annual percentage rate resulting from this fee or interest rate.

(2) When advertising the availability of small loans, compliance with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations, including the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Sec. [Part] 226 constitutes compliance with subsection (1) of this section.

(3) When making a small loan, each licensee shall disclose to the borrower the terms of the small loan, including the principal amount of the small loan, the total of payments of the small loan, the fee or interest rate charged by the licensee on the small loan, and the annual percentage rate resulting from this fee or interest rate.

(4) When making a small loan, disclosure of the terms of the small loan in compliance with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations, including the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Sec. [Part] 226 constitutes compliance with subsection (3) of this section.

[ 2003 c 86 s 14.]